South Dakota, session 2026, SB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-5-157.1 be AMENDED:
32-5-157.1. A disabled veteran with a disability, or the spouse of a veteran with
a disability, may obtain standard issue county motor vehicle or motorcycle license plates
in lieu of disabled veteran plates if the disabled veteran by paying the fees according to
§ 32-5-160, if the veteran with the disability meets the requirements listed in §§ 32-5-
156 and 32-5-157. A disabled veteran who obtains plates pursuant to this section shall
pay fees according to § 32-5-160.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.